North Dakota statutes. TITLE 20.1 Game, Fish, Predators, and Boating
CHAPTER 20.1-01 General Provisions
20.1-01-27.
Disposition of animals killed by motor vehicle.

Whenever any big game animal is killed by a motor vehicle on a public highway or roadway, any person who desires to possess that animal shall notify as soon as possible any game warden or other authorized person. The authorized person shall give a dated and written note of validation which allows legal possession of the animal and authorizes the person whose name appears thereon to possess or dispose of the animal. The note of validation must remain with the carcass while in processing or storage. There is no fee for the inspection and validation.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 298, § 1; 1983, ch. 263, § 1.

Collateral References.

Liability for killing or injuring, by motor vehicle, livestock or fowl upon highway, 55 A.L.R.4th 822.

Governmental liability for failure to post highway deer crossing warning signs, 59 A.L.R.4th 1217.

20.1-01-28.
Certain game and fish violations noncriminal — Procedures.

Any person who has been cited for a violation that is designated as a noncriminal offense in this title or in related rules or proclamations may appear before a court of competent jurisdiction and pay the statutory fee at or prior to the time scheduled for a hearing, or if bond has been posted, may forfeit the bond by not appearing at the scheduled time. A person appearing at the time scheduled in the citation may make a statement in explanation of that person’s action and the judge may at that time waive, reduce, or suspend the statutory fee or bond, or both. If the person cited follows the foregoing procedures, that person has admitted the violation and has waived the right to a hearing on the issue of commission of the violation. The bond required to secure appearance before the judge must be identical to the statutory fee established by section 20.1-01-30. Within ten days after forfeiture of bond or payment of the statutory fee, the judge shall certify to the director admission of the violation.

This section does not allow a halting officer to receive the statutory fee or bond.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 272, § 5; 1987, ch. 269, § 1; 1991, ch. 231, § 7.

20.1-01-29.
Hearing procedures.

If a person cited for a violation that is designated as a noncriminal offense in this title or in related rules or proclamations does not choose to follow one of the procedures set forth in section 20.1-01-28, that person may request a hearing on the issue of the commission of the violation charged. The hearing must be held at the time scheduled in the citation or at some future time, not to exceed ninety days later, set at that first appearance.

At the time of a request for a hearing on the issue of commission of the violation, the person charged shall deposit with the court an appearance bond equal to the statutory fee for the violation charged.

The state must prove the commission of a charged violation at the hearing under this section by a preponderance of the evidence. If, after a hearing, the court finds that the person had committed a noncriminal violation of this title or of related proclamations or rules, the court shall notify the department within ten days of the date of hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 272, § 6; 1987, ch. 269, § 2.

20.1-01-30.
Amount of statutory fees.

The fees required for a noncriminal disposition pursuant to section 20.1-01-28 or 20.1-01-29 are as follows:

For a class 1 noncriminal offense, a fee of fifty dollars.

For a class 2 noncriminal offense, a fee of twenty-five dollars.

For violation of a rule approved by the director or of an order or proclamation issued by the governor, the amount set in the rule, order, or proclamation up to a maximum of two hundred fifty dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 272, § 7; 1987, ch. 269, § 3; 1991, ch. 231, § 8.

20.1-01-31.
Interference with rights of hunters and trappers.

An individual may not intentionally interfere with the lawful taking of wildlife on public or private land by another or intentionally harass, drive, or disturb any wildlife on public or private land for the purpose of disrupting a lawful hunt. The individual may not use an aerial vehicle that does not carry a human operator on public or private land to intentionally interfere with the lawful taking of wildlife by another individual or intentionally harass, drive, or disturb any wildlife for the purpose of disrupting a lawful hunt. Except for department personnel, the individual setting the trap or snare, or that individual’s agent, another individual may not remove or tamper with a trap or snare legally set to take fur-bearing animals or unprotected wild animals or remove the fur-bearing animal or unprotected wild animal from a trap or snare. This section does not apply to any incidental interference arising from lawful activity by public or private land users or to landowners or operators interfering with hunters on land owned or operated by that individual.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 270, § 1; 1989, ch. 276, § 1; 1995, ch. 224, § 1; 2015, ch. 175, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of statutes prohibiting harassment of hunters, fishermen, or trappers, 17 A.L.R.5th 837.

20.1-01-32.
Use of handguns while hunting with bow and arrow or crossbow.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may have a handgun, as defined in section 62.1-01-01, in that individual’s possession while hunting during any lawful archery hunting season.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 216, § 1.

20.1-01-33.
Exploitation of wildlife — Penalty.

A person is guilty of exploitation of wildlife if that person intentionally:

Commits five or more title 20.1 class A misdemeanor offenses within a two-year period;

Commits seven or more title 20.1 misdemeanor offenses within a two-year period;

Furnishes assistance, management, or supervision to an individual who commits or assists in the commission of seven or more title 20.1 misdemeanor offenses within a two-year period; or

Commits a title 20.1 misdemeanor offense after having been previously convicted of seven or more title 20.1 misdemeanor offenses within a ten-year period.

Violation of this section is a class C felony and, in addition to other penalties imposed by law, is subject to section 20.1-01-26. The defendant being over a daily or possession limit of fish, small game, or waterfowl is not sufficient as a predicate offense for a conviction under subdivision b or c of subsection 1 unless the state proves that the conduct occurred over more than three days or the person takes or possesses more than four times a daily limit and the state alleges and proves beyond a reasonable doubt that the minimum number of predicate offenses required were committed intentionally. Except for a charge under subdivision d of subsection 1, the state may not charge an individual for both the predicate offense and a charge under this section. A conviction from another state or a federal court for an offense similar to one prescribed in title 20.1 may be used as a conviction under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 202, § 2.

20.1-01-34.
Crossbow legal weapon.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may use a crossbow during the duration of any deer gun season the individual possesses the appropriate deer gun license.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 171, § 1.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

20.1-01-35.
Hunting through the internet prohibited — Penalty.

A person may not:

Hunt through the internet;

Host a hunt through the internet;

Import, export, or possess wildlife or any part thereof which has been taken by a hunt through the internet; or

Otherwise enable another person to hunt through the internet.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 169, § 2.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

20.1-01-36.
Suppressor and short-barreled rifle allowed for hunting.

An individual in lawful possession of a device that will silence or deaden the sound or natural report of a firearm when the firearm is discharged may hunt any game for which the individual is licensed and for which a firearm is allowed with that device for or attached to the firearm.

An individual in lawful possession of a short-barreled rifle may hunt any game for which the individual is licensed and for which a rifle is allowed.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 189, § 1; 2015, ch. 475, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

20.1-01-37.
Permission required for baiting — Penalty.

Without permission from the owner or an individual authorized by the owner of the property, an individual may not enter upon another person’s property and intentionally place bait to attract or manipulate the behavior of wildlife. An individual’s first violation of this section is a class 1 noncriminal offense. An individual’s second or subsequent violation of this section is an infraction for which a fine of two hundred fifty dollars must be imposed.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 183, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.